New Mexico, session 2026, HB96.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. TEMPORARY PROVISION--SPACE COMMISSION
WORKING GROUP--CREATED--DUTIES--FINAL REPORT.--
A. The "space commission working group" is created
to study and make recommendations on the feasibility of
establishing a space commission and drafting a proposal for
the structure and scope of the space commission. The working
group shall consist of:
(1) one member appointed by the governor;
(2) one member appointed by the lieutenant
governor;
(3) one member appointed by the president
pro tempore of the senate;
(4) one member appointed by the speaker of
the house of representatives;
(5) one member appointed by the minority
floor leader of the house of representatives; and
(6) one member appointed by the minority
floor leader of the senate.
B. In making appointments to the space commission
working group, prioritization shall be made for persons with HB 96/a
Page 1

experience in commercial aerospace, civil aviation, space
economic development, space-related academic research and
nonprofit work that supports the space economy.
C. Appointment of members to the space commission
working group shall be made by July 1, 2026. Members
appointed shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing
officer. A vacancy shall be filled within thirty days after
the vacancy occurs in the manner of the original appointment.
D. The space commission working group shall elect
a chair from its membership. The working group shall meet at
the call of the chair or at the request of a majority of its
members, as necessary to carry out its duties, but not less
than once per month. A majority of the members constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business, and the support of a
majority of the members is required for adoption of any
action.
E. The space commission working group shall study
and develop a report of its recommendations regarding the
establishment of a space commission, including:
(1) the feasibility of establishing a space
commission as the statewide authority for the aerospace
industry;
(2) the identification of key stakeholders
currently involved in civil and commercial aerospace;
(3) a strategic plan for the space HB 96/a
Page 2

commission that details its authority, scope of work and
responsibilities, including educational and workforce
pathways; and
(4) the design for a board of directors for
the space commission, including the composition of its
members, structure, scope of work, responsibilities and
budgetary requirements.
F. By October 1, 2026, the space commission
working group shall report its findings and recommendations
to the interim legislative committee that studies economic
development.
G. Members of the space commission working group
are entitled to receive per diem and mileage as provided in
the Per Diem and Mileage Act and shall receive no other
compensation, perquisite or allowance for their service on
the working group.
H. The economic development department shall
provide the necessary staff and administrative support to the
space commission working group, and the department may hire
one staff member to support the space commission working
group.
I. The space commission working group shall be
dissolved effective December 31, 2026. HB 96/a
Page 3